Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 55
COOPERATIVES - GENERAL

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 30, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

(2) For provisions concerning cooperative housing corporations, see article 33.5 of title 38; for provisions concerning regulation of cooperative electric associations, see article 9.5 of title 40.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Long and Winding Road to Public Benefit

C

orporations in

C

olorado", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2014).

Section

7-55-101. Cooperative association defined.

The terms "cooperative association" and "association" include any cooperative organization, association, company, or corporation formed under this article and may be further defined as follows:

The distribution of its earnings is made wholly or in part on the basis of, or in proportion to, the amount of property bought from or sold to members, or to members and other patrons, or of labor performed or other service rendered by the association, but such association shall not deal in products, handle supplies, or provide services for nonmembers in an amount greater in value than as are handled by it for members.

Dividends on stock or interest on equity capital shall be limited, as prescribed in the bylaws of the association.

Voting rights shall be limited to members of the association.

Such association and its business shall not be carried on for profit but for the mutual benefit of all the members. Any person, firm, or corporation of any other cooperative association may become a member of such association upon meeting uniform terms and conditions stated in its bylaws. The association shall issue a certificate of membership to all who become members, which shall not be assignable or transferable except upon consent of the board of directors. The association shall have the right by the bylaws to limit transfer or assignment of membership and the terms and conditions upon which transfer shall be allowed.

Any association formed pursuant to this article may admit to membership any other association so formed or formed under the law of any other jurisdiction upon such terms and conditions as may be provided by the bylaws. Any association formed under the provisions of this article may acquire membership in any other association likewise formed under the provisions of this article when, in the judgment of the directors, such membership shall promote the interest and purpose for which such association is formed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 428, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-1.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 543, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended, p. 2214, § 51, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 1408, § 29, effective July 1.

7-55-101.5. Patronage capital for cooperative electric associations and cooperative telephone associations defined.

The term "patronage capital" includes any capital credit, patronage dividend, or patronage refund allocated by a cooperative electric association or cooperative telephone association to a member or patron thereof.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 413, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 330, § 1, effective March 29.

7-55-102. Articles of incorporation - filing.

Five persons or more, except as specified elsewhere in this article, a majority of whom are residents of Colorado, may be associated and incorporated pursuant to this article for the cooperative transaction of any lawful business, except banking. Persons desiring to avail themselves of the provisions of this article shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of incorporation stating:

The domestic entity name of the association, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The purposes for which the association was formed;

The principal office address of the association's principal office;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the association's initial registered agent;

Repealed.

The number and terms of directors, which number shall be not less than three;

The authorized capital stock, the number of shares into which said stock is divided, and the par value of each;

The number of memberships authorized, the capital subscription of each, and the method of determining property rights and interests of each member without capital stock;

The true name and mailing address of each incorporator.

(1.5) The articles of incorporation may state a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director as provided in section 7-55-107 (1)(h).

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 429, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-2.

L. 87:

(1.5) added, p. 370, § 12, effective May 20.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 543, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 948, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), and (1.5) amended and (1)(c.5) added, p. 2215, § 52, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 1408, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(h) amended, p. 18, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(d) repealed, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1128, § 2, effective December 1.

7-55-103. Bylaws.

Each association formed under this article shall, within thirty days after filing its articles of incorporation with the secretary of state, adopt bylaws for the government and management of its affairs that are not inconsistent with this article. Such bylaws may be amended or modified in such manner as the bylaws may provide. Such bylaws may include:

The time, place, and manner of conducting its meetings;

The number and term of directors and the time of their election;

The mode and manner of removal of directors and the mode and manner of filling vacancies in the board caused by death, resignation, or removal;

The power and authority of directors and number which shall constitute a quorum, which must be at least a majority;

The compensation of directors and officers;

The number of officers other than directors, if any, their term of office, the mode of removal, and the method of filling a vacancy;

The mode and manner of conducting business;

The mode and manner of conducting elections and provisions for voting by ballots forwarded by mail or otherwise;

The qualifications for membership, manner of succession, and conditions for withdrawal or expulsion;

The amount of membership fee, conditions of membership, procedures for acquiring capital, and the limitations of dividends on stock or interest on equity capital;

The manner of collection or enforcement procedures and the forfeiture of property rights and interests for nonpayment or nonperformance;

The method of determination of property rights and interests and time by which it shall be paid or delivered to such member or the member's representative upon withdrawal, expulsion, or death;

Such other things as may be proper to carry out the purpose for which the association was formed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 429, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-3.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 543, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(l) amended, p. 1408, § 31, effective July 1.

7-55-104. Board of directors.

The board of directors of a cooperative association shall be stockholders or members of such association or the representatives duly authorized in writing of a legal entity which is a stockholder or member of said cooperative association; except that the articles of incorporation and bylaws may permit the election of any number of directors, less than a majority, who are not stockholders or members, to be elected as stated in the bylaws.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 430, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-4.

7-55-105. Election of officers.

The officers of an association formed under this article shall consist of a president, one or more vice-presidents as may be prescribed by the bylaws, a secretary, and a treasurer, each of whom shall be elected by the board of directors at such time and in such manner as may be prescribed by the bylaws, and none of whom are required to be directors of such association unless the bylaws so provide. The bylaws may provide that any of such officers may not be directors of such an association. The bylaws may provide for the election by the board of directors, from among their number, of a chair of the board of directors and one or more vice-chairs. Such other officers and assistant officers and agents as are necessary may be elected or appointed by the board of directors or chosen in such manner as may be prescribed by the bylaws. The board may combine the offices of secretary and treasurer and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer, or unite both functions and titles in one person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and, as such, shall not be considered as an officer but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer; except that the funds shall be deposited only as authorized by the board of directors. All officers and agents of the association, as between themselves and the association, shall have such authority and perform such duties in the management of the association as may be provided in the bylaws, or as may be determined by resolution of the board of directors not inconsistent with the bylaws.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 430, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-5.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2215, § 53, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1408, § 32, effective July 1.

7-55-106. Power of directors.

A majority of the board of directors of a cooperative association has full power or authority to authorize the execution and delivery of mortgages or deeds of trust upon, or the pledging of or encumbering of any or all of the property, assets, licenses, franchises, and permits or other things of value of, such association or corporation, whether acquired or to be acquired and wherever situated, as well as any revenues and incomes therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as such board of directors determines, to secure any indebtedness of such corporation.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 430, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-6.

7-55-107. Powers.

Every cooperative association has the power:

To have succession by its domestic entity name;

To sue and be sued and to complain and defend in courts of law and equity;

To make and use a common seal, and alter the same at its pleasure;

To hold such real and personal property as may be necessary for the legitimate business of the corporation;

To regulate and limit the right of stockholders or members to transfer their stock or member equity;

To appoint such subordinate officers and agents as the business of the corporation shall require and to allow them suitable compensation therefor;

To adopt bylaws for the management of its affairs and to provide therein for the terms and limitations of stock ownership or membership and for the distribution of its earnings;

If so provided in the articles of incorporation, to eliminate or limit the personal liability of a director to the association or to its members or stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director; except that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for: Any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the association or its members or stockholders; acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit. No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director to the association or to its members or stockholders for monetary damages for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

Every cooperative electric association or cooperative telephone association formed pursuant to this article and any cooperative electric association or cooperative telephone association that is subject to articles 121 to 137 of this title has the power to use patronage capital that has been declared by such association to be distributable or payable to a member or patron for expenditures associated with the provision of electric service or telephone service, as the case may be, as directed by the board of directors of the association after the association has given notice thereof. Such notice may consist of a negotiable instrument that has not been claimed within three years of issuance or publication.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 431, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-7.

L. 87:

(1)(h) added, p. 370, § 13, effective May 20.

L. 90:

(2) added, p. 413, § 2, effective March 9.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 330, § 2, effective March 29.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 758, § 18, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 948, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2216, § 54, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-107.5. Indemnification and personal liability of directors, officers, employees, and agents.

The association shall have the same powers, rights, and obligations and shall be subject to the same limitations as apply to domestic corporations as set forth in article 109 of this title 7. Association directors, officers, employees, and agents shall have the same rights as directors, officers, employees, and agents, respectively, of domestic corporations as set forth in article 109 of this title 7. Association directors and officers shall have the benefit of the same limitations on personal liability for any injury to person or property arising out of a tort as set forth in section 7-108-403 for directors and officers, respectively, of domestic corporations. Any reference in said sections to shareholders shall be construed to refer to voting members or voting stockholders, if any, for the purpose of this section.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 371, § 14, effective May 20.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 16, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2216, § 55, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1964, § 63, effective July 1, 2020.

7-55-108. Application of powers.

The powers enumerated in section 7-55-107 shall vest in every cooperative association in this state except those formed under or subject to article 56 of this title, although such powers may not be stated in its charter or in its articles of incorporation.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 431, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-8.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 544, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2216, § 56, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-109. Amendment of articles.

The articles of incorporation of a cooperative association or corporation may be amended at any regular or special meeting of the stockholders or members of such association. The proposed amendment must be first approved by a two-thirds majority of the directors. The notice of such meeting shall state or have attached thereto the proposed amendment and shall be mailed to each member of record at least ten days prior to the meeting date; except that cooperative associations with less than one hundred members may post notice of such meeting in a conspicuous place at its normal place of business for at least thirty days prior to such meeting. The proposed amendment shall be approved by an affirmative vote of a majority of the stockholders or members present or voting by mail. A certificate stating such amendment and the adoption thereof shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 431, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-9.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 871, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2216, § 57, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1409, § 33, effective July 1.

7-55-110. Vote of stockholders or members.

Stockholders or members of a cooperative association may vote either in person or by mail as provided in the bylaws. Proxy or cumulative voting shall be prohibited except as permitted by the articles of incorporation and the bylaws of organizations incorporated prior to July 6, 1973.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 431, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-10.

7-55-111. Use of the term "cooperative" - penalty for unlawful use - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 431, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-11.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 706, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 544, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 948, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-55-112. Merger, conversion, or consolidation.

Two or more corporations formed under articles 30 to 55 or subject to articles 121 to 137 or articles 101 to 117 of this title, or a similar law of any jurisdiction, may be merged or consolidated as a cooperative association, or any cooperative association may convert into any form of entity permitted by section 7-90-201, upon such terms and for such purpose and by such domestic entity name as may be agreed upon, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title. Such agreement shall also state all the matters necessary to a statement of merger, statement of conversion, or articles of consolidation and shall be approved by a two-thirds majority of the members of the boards of directors and a two-thirds majority vote of the members or stockholders of each association, nonprofit corporation, or corporation present and voting in person or by mail ballot at any regular or special meeting at which prior notice, with mail ballot attached, had been mailed to each member or stockholder stating the plan of merger, conversion, or consolidation; except that cooperative associations with less than one hundred members may post notice of such plan of merger or consolidation in a conspicuous place at its normal place of business for at least thirty days prior to such meeting. A statement of merger complying with section 7-90-203.7, a statement of conversion complying with section 7-90-201.7, or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, and a certificate of the secretary of state as to the fact of such filing shall be recorded in the office of each county in which each party to the merger, conversion, or consolidation is situated. From and after the filing of articles of consolidation, the former associations, nonprofit corporations, or corporations comprising the component parts shall cease to exist, and the consolidated cooperative association shall succeed to all rights, duties, and powers prescribed in the agreement of consolidated associations, nonprofit corporations, or corporations, not inconsistent with this article, and shall be subject to all liabilities and obligations of the former component associations, nonprofit corporations, or corporations and succeed to all property and interest thereof and may adopt bylaws and do all things permitted by this article. The effect of a conversion shall be as provided in section 7-90-202. The effect of a merger shall be as provided in section 7-90-204.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 432, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-12.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 871, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 17, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 544, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 759, § 19, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 949, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1813, § 14, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1678, § 12, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2217, § 58, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 218, § 1, effective May 29.

7-55-113. Adoption of provisions of this article.

Every cooperative association, as defined in section 7-55-101 or formed or incorporated under any repealed Colorado statute pertaining to cooperative associations, except corporations or associations formed or incorporated under or subject to article 56 of this title, shall be conclusively presumed to have accepted and adopted the provisions of this article and shall be governed by the provisions of this article, unless such corporation or association or agricultural or livestock association has delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a copy of a resolution adopted by its board of directors, its members, or its stockholders stating that it has elected not to become subject to the provisions of this article. This section shall not apply to cooperative associations formed and incorporated under or subject to article 56 of this title.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 432, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-13.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 272, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 872, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 545, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1814, § 15, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1678, § 13, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2217, § 59, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-114. Dissolution of association.

Any association formed under this article may be dissolved and its affairs terminated voluntarily by a two-thirds majority vote of the members present and voting in person or by mail ballot at a regular or special meeting, if the meeting notice, with a mail ballot attached, stated that dissolution would be discussed; except that cooperative associations with less than one hundred members may post notice of the discussion of such dissolution in a conspicuous place at their normal place of business for at least thirty days prior to such meeting. The board of directors by a two-thirds majority vote of its members shall first adopt a resolution recommending dissolution and submit it to the members, stating the reasons why the termination of the affairs of the association is deemed advisable, the time by which it should be accomplished, and shall also name three persons who are members of the association to act as trustees in liquidation who shall have full power to do all things necessary in liquidation and termination of the affairs of the association. Upon approval of the resolution to dissolve by the members, the association shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of dissolution. A certified copy of the articles of dissolution shall be filed with the county clerk in the county in which the principal business is transacted. All power of the directors shall cease and the persons appointed shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the association and realize upon its assets, pay its debts, and divide the remaining money among the members and holders of equity, as stated in the bylaws or, if not stated, in proportion to their property interests.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-14.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 872, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 545, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1814, § 16, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1679, § 14, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2218, § 60, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1409, § 34, effective July 1.

7-55-115. Exemption from securities laws.

Any security, patronage refund, per unit retain certificate, or evidence of membership issued or sold by a cooperative association as an investment in its stock or capital to the members of a cooperative association formed under this article or a similar law of any other state and authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state is exempt from securities laws as contained in article 51 of title 11, C.R.S. Such securities, patronage refunds, per unit retain certificates, or evidence of membership may be sold lawfully by the issuer or its members or salaried employees without the necessity of being registered as a broker or dealer under the "Colorado Securities Act", article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-15.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 1116, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 740, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 546, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2218, § 61, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-116. Application of corporation laws.

The provisions of articles 30 to 52, 101 to 117, and 121 to 137 of this title and all powers and rights thereunder shall apply to the associations organized under this article, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with an express provision of this article.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-16.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 18, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 759, § 20, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 219, § 2, effective May 29.

7-55-117. Associations not in restraint of trade.

No association formed under this article shall be deemed to be in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices, nor shall the membership agreements or marketing contracts between the association and its members be illegal or in unlawful restraint of trade, or in any combination thereof to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-17.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2219, § 62, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-118. Associations of other jurisdictions.

Any cooperative corporation or association formed under generally similar law of another jurisdiction may carry on any proper activities, operations, and functions in this state upon compliance with part 8 of article 90 of this title, with all rights of cooperative associations formed pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-18.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2219, § 63, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1410, § 35, effective July 1.

7-55-119. Quorum.

A quorum for the election of directors, amending of the articles of incorporation, and conducting normal business at all meetings of the stockholders or members shall be five percent of the stockholders or members or fifty members or stockholders present in person, whichever is less. Nothing shall prevent the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of such association from requiring a larger percent as a quorum.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 433, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-19.

7-55-120. Incorporation fees.

The fee for the incorporation of cooperative corporations or associations shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., if formed with or without capital stock, payable to the secretary of state except as otherwise set forth in this article.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 434, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-20.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 430, § 5, July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2219, § 64, effective July 1, 2004.

7-55-121. Periodic report.

Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, applies to associations formed under or subject to this article.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 434, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 30-1-21.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 873, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2219, § 65, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1993, § 2, effective August 11.